Illinois, session 104th, HB2749.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Sections 2605-375, 2605-585, 2605-590, 2605-595, and 2605-605 7as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-375)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part)9    Sec. 2605-375. Missing persons; Law Enforcement Agencies 10Data System (LEADS).11    (a) To utilize the statewide Law Enforcement Agencies Data 12System (LEADS) for the purpose of providing electronic access 13by authorized entities to criminal justice data repositories 14and effecting an immediate law enforcement response to reports 15of missing persons, including lost, missing or runaway minors, 16lost or missing individuals with developmental or intellectual 17disabilities, and missing endangered seniors. The Illinois 18State Police shall implement an automatic data exchange system 19to compile, to maintain, and to make available to other law 20enforcement agencies for immediate dissemination data that can 21assist appropriate agencies in recovering missing persons and 22provide access by authorized entities to various data 23repositories available through LEADS for criminal justice and   HB2749- 2 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1related purposes. To assist the Illinois State Police in this 2effort, funds may be appropriated from the State Police Law 3Enforcement Administration Fund LEADS Maintenance Fund. Funds 4may be appropriated from the State Police Law Enforcement 5Administration Fund LEADS Maintenance Fund to the Illinois 6State Police to finance any of its lawful purposes or 7functions in relation to defraying the expenses associated 8with establishing, maintaining, and supporting the issuance of 9electronic citations. 10    (b) In exercising its duties under this Section, the 11Illinois State Police shall provide a uniform reporting format 12(LEADS) for the entry of pertinent information regarding the 13report of a missing person into LEADS. The report must include 14all of the following: 15        (1) Relevant information obtained from the 16    notification concerning the missing person, including all 17    of the following:18            (A) a physical description of the missing person;19            (B) the date, time, and place that the missing 20        person was last seen; and21            (C) the missing person's address.22        (2) Information gathered by a preliminary 23    investigation, if one was made.24        (3) A statement by the law enforcement officer in 25    charge stating the officer's assessment of the case based 26    on the evidence and information received.  HB2749- 3 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (b-5) The Illinois State Police shall:2        (1) Develop and implement a policy whereby a statewide 3    or regional alert would be used in situations relating to 4    the disappearances of individuals, based on criteria and 5    in a format established by the Illinois State Police. Such 6    a format shall include, but not be limited to, the age of 7    the missing person and the suspected circumstance of the 8    disappearance.9        (2) Notify all law enforcement agencies that reports 10    of missing persons shall be entered as soon as the minimum 11    level of data specified by the Illinois State Police is 12    available to the reporting agency and that no waiting 13    period for the entry of the data exists.14        (3) Compile and retain information regarding lost, 15    abducted, missing, or runaway minors in a separate data 16    file, in a manner that allows that information to be used 17    by law enforcement and other agencies deemed appropriate 18    by the Director, for investigative purposes. The 19    information shall include the disposition of all reported 20    lost, abducted, missing, or runaway minor cases.21        (4) Compile and maintain an historic data repository 22    relating to lost, abducted, missing, or runaway minors and 23    other missing persons, including, but not limited to, lost 24    or missing individuals with developmental or intellectual 25    disabilities and missing endangered seniors, in order to 26    develop and improve techniques utilized by law enforcement   HB2749- 4 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    agencies when responding to reports of missing persons.2        (5) Create a quality control program regarding 3    confirmation of missing person data, timeliness of entries 4    of missing person reports into LEADS, and performance 5    audits of all entering agencies.6    (c) The Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 7shall conduct a training program for law enforcement personnel 8of local governmental agencies in the Missing Persons 9Identification Act. 10    (d) The Illinois State Police shall perform the duties 11prescribed in the Missing Persons Identification Act, subject 12to appropriation. 13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-585)15    Sec. 2605-585. Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund. 16Moneys and the sale proceeds distributed to the Illinois State 17Police under paragraph (3) of Section 29B-26 of the Criminal 18Code of 2012 shall be deposited in a special fund in the State 19treasury to be known as the State Police Law Enforcement 20Administration Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund. The 21moneys deposited in the State Police Law Enforcement 22Administration Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund shall be 23appropriated to and administered by the Illinois State Police 24for State law enforcement purposes. This Fund is dissolved 25upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the Money   HB2749- 5 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Laundering Asset Recovery Fund to the State Police Law 2Enforcement Administration Fund as provided under subsection 3(b) of Section 6z-106 of the State Finance Act. This Section is 4repealed on January 1, 2027. 5(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 6    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-590)7    Sec. 2605-590. Drug Traffic Prevention Fund. Moneys 8deposited into the Drug Traffic Prevention Fund pursuant to 9subsection (e) of Section 5-9-1.1 and subsection (c) of 10Section 5-9-1.1-5 of the Unified Code of Corrections shall be 11appropriated to and administered by the Illinois State Police 12for funding of drug task forces and Metropolitan Enforcement 13Groups in accordance with the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 14Enforcement Act. The Drug Traffic Prevention Fund is dissolved 15upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the Drug 16Traffic Prevention Fund to the State Police Operations 17Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (i) of Section 186z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 19January 1, 2027. 20(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-595)22    Sec. 2605-595. State Police Firearm Services Fund.23    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 24known as the State Police Firearm Services Fund. The Fund   HB2749- 6 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1shall receive revenue under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 2the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, Article 24 of 3the Criminal Code of 2012, other provisions of law concerning 4firearm offenses, and Section 5 of the Firearm Owners 5Identification Card Act. The Fund may also receive revenue 6from grants, pass-through grants, donations, appropriations, 7and any other legal source.8    (a-5) (Blank). 9    (a-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 10contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 11provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 13practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 14Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the State 15Police Firearm Enforcement Fund into the State Police Firearm 16Services Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the State 17Police Firearm Enforcement Fund is dissolved, and any future 18deposits due to that Fund and any outstanding obligations or 19liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the State Police 20Firearm Services Fund.21    (a-15) The Illinois State Police may use moneys from the 22Fund to establish task forces and, if necessary, include other 23law enforcement agencies, under intergovernmental contracts 24written and executed in conformity with the Intergovernmental 25Cooperation Act.26    (a-20) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the   HB2749- 7 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Fund to hire and train Illinois State Police officers and for 2the prevention of violent crime. 3    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 4finance any of its lawful purposes, mandates, functions, 5enforcement, and duties under the Firearm Owners 6Identification Card Act, the Firearm Dealer License 7Certification Act, Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 8provisions of law concerning firearm offenses, and the Firearm 9Concealed Carry Act, including the cost of sending notices of 10expiration of Firearm Owner's Identification Cards, concealed 11carry licenses, the prompt and efficient processing of 12applications under the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act 13and the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the improved efficiency 14and reporting of the LEADS and federal NICS law enforcement 15data systems, and support for investigations required under 16these Acts and law. Any surplus funds beyond what is needed to 17comply with the aforementioned purposes shall be used by the 18Illinois State Police to improve the Law Enforcement Agencies 19Data System (LEADS) and criminal history background check 20system. 21    (b-5) Any surplus in the Fund beyond what is necessary to 22ensure compliance with subsections (a) through (b) or moneys 23that are specifically appropriated for those purposes shall be 24used by the Illinois State Police to award grants to assist 25with the data reporting requirements of the Gun Trafficking 26Information Act.   HB2749- 8 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (c) Investment income that is attributable to the 2investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 3for the uses specified in this Section. 4(Source: P.A. 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 5103-363, eff. 7-28-23.) 6    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-605)7    Sec. 2605-605. Violent Crime Intelligence Task Force. The 8Director of the Illinois State Police shall establish a 9statewide multi-jurisdictional Violent Crime Intelligence Task 10Force led by the Illinois State Police dedicated to combating 11gun violence, gun-trafficking, and other violent crime with 12the primary mission of preservation of life and reducing the 13occurrence and the fear of crime. The objectives of the Task 14Force shall include, but not be limited to, reducing and 15preventing illegal possession and use of firearms, 16firearm-related homicides, and other violent crimes, and 17solving firearm-related crimes. 18    (1) The Task Force may develop and acquire information, 19training, tools, and resources necessary to implement a 20data-driven approach to policing, with an emphasis on 21intelligence development.22    (2) The Task Force may utilize information sharing, 23partnerships, crime analysis, and evidence-based practices to 24assist in the reduction of firearm-related shootings, 25homicides, and gun-trafficking, including, but not limited to,   HB2749- 9 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1ballistic data, eTrace data, DNA evidence, latent 2fingerprints, firearm training data, and National Integrated 3Ballistic Information Network (NIBIN) data. The Task Force may 4design a model crime gun intelligence strategy which may 5include, but is not limited to, comprehensive collection and 6documentation of all ballistic evidence, timely transfer of 7NIBIN and eTrace leads to an intelligence center, which may 8include the Division of Criminal Investigation of the Illinois 9State Police, timely dissemination of intelligence to 10investigators, investigative follow-up, and coordinated 11prosecution.12    (3) The Task Force may recognize and utilize best 13practices of community policing and may develop potential 14partnerships with faith-based and community organizations to 15achieve its goals.16    (4) The Task Force may identify and utilize best practices 17in drug-diversion programs and other community-based services 18to redirect low-level offenders.19    (5) The Task Force may assist in violence suppression 20strategies including, but not limited to, details in 21identified locations that have shown to be the most prone to 22gun violence and violent crime, focused deterrence against 23violent gangs and groups considered responsible for the 24violence in communities, and other intelligence driven methods 25deemed necessary to interrupt cycles of violence or prevent 26retaliation.  HB2749- 10 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (6) In consultation with the Chief Procurement Officer, 2the Illinois State Police may obtain contracts for software, 3commodities, resources, and equipment to assist the Task Force 4with achieving this Act. Any contracts necessary to support 5the delivery of necessary software, commodities, resources, 6and equipment are not subject to the Illinois Procurement 7Code, except for Sections 20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and 8Article 50 of that Code, provided that the Chief Procurement 9Officer may, in writing with justification, waive any 10certification required under Article 50 of the Illinois 11Procurement Code.12    (7) The Task Force shall conduct enforcement operations 13against persons whose Firearm Owner's Identification Cards 14have been revoked or suspended and persons who fail to comply 15with the requirements of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners 16Identification Card Act, prioritizing individuals presenting a 17clear and present danger to themselves or to others under 18paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 8.1 of the Firearm 19Owners Identification Card Act.20    (8) The Task Force shall collaborate with local law 21enforcement agencies to enforce provisions of the Firearm 22Owners Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry 23Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, and Article 2424 of the Criminal Code of 2012.25    (9) To implement this Section, the Director of the 26Illinois State Police may establish intergovernmental   HB2749- 11 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1agreements with law enforcement agencies in accordance with 2the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act.3    (10) Law enforcement agencies that participate in 4activities described in paragraphs (7) through (9) may apply 5to the Illinois State Police for grants from the State Police 6Firearm Services Fund State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund. 7(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 9    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 10Sections 5.99, 5.456, 5.462, 5.530, 5.771, 5.905, 5.920, 115.963, 6z-82, 6z-106, 6z-127, and 8.37 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/5.99)  (from Ch. 127, par. 141.99)13    Sec. 5.99. The Drug Traffic Prevention Fund. This Fund is 14dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the 15Drug Traffic Prevention Fund to the State Police Operations 16Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (i) of Section 176z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 18January 1, 2027. 19(Source: P.A. 82-783.) 20    (30 ILCS 105/5.456)21    Sec. 5.456. The LEADS Maintenance Fund. This Fund is 22dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the 23LEADS Maintenance Fund to the State Police Law Enforcement   HB2749- 12 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Administration Fund as provided under subsection (a-5) of 2Section 6z-106 of the State Finance Act. This Section is 3repealed on January 1, 2027. 4(Source: P.A. 90-130, eff. 1-1-98; 90-655, eff. 7-30-98.) 5    (30 ILCS 105/5.462)6    Sec. 5.462. The Offender Registration Fund. This Fund is 7dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the 8Offender Registration Fund to the State Police Operations 9Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (k) of Section 106z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 11January 1, 2027. 12(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19.) 13    (30 ILCS 105/5.530)14    Sec. 5.530. The State Police Wireless Service Emergency 15Fund. This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 16remaining balance from the State Police Wireless Service 17Emergency Fund to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 18as provided under subsection (j) of Section 6z-82 of the State 19Finance Act. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 20(Source: P.A. 91-660, eff. 12-22-99; 92-16, eff. 6-28-01.) 21    (30 ILCS 105/5.771)22    Sec. 5.771. The Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund. This 23Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance   HB2749- 13 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1from the Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund to the State 2Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund as provided under 3subsection (b) of Section 6z-106 of the State Finance Act. 4This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 5(Source: P.A. 96-1234, eff. 7-23-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.905)7    Sec. 5.905. The Scott's Law Fund. This Fund is dissolved 8upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the Scott's 9Law Fund to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund as 10provided under subsection (m) of Section 6z-82 of the State 11Finance Act. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 12(Source: P.A. 101-173, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 13    (30 ILCS 105/5.920)14    Sec. 5.920. The State Police Whistleblower Reward and 15Protection Fund. This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of 16the remaining balance from the State Police Whistleblower 17Reward and Protection Fund to the State Police Operations 18Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (l) of Section 196z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 20January 1, 2027. 21(Source: P.A. 101-148, eff. 7-26-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 22    (30 ILCS 105/5.963)23    Sec. 5.963. The State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.   HB2749- 14 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining 2balance from the State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund to the 3State Police Firearm Services Fund as provided under 4subsection (a-10) of Section 2605-595 of the Illinois State 5Police Law. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 6(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (30 ILCS 105/6z-82)9    Sec. 6z-82. State Police Operations Assistance Fund.10    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 11known as the State Police Operations Assistance Fund. The Fund 12shall receive revenue under the Criminal and Traffic 13Assessment Act and Section 8 of the Illinois False Claims Act. 14The Fund may also receive revenue from grants, donations, 15appropriations, and any other legal source.16    (a-5) This Fund may charge, collect, and receive fees or 17moneys as described in Section 15-312 of the Illinois Vehicle 18Code and receive all fees received by the Illinois State 19Police under that Section. The moneys shall be used by the 20Illinois State Police for its expenses in providing police 21escorts and commercial vehicle enforcement activities. 22    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 23finance any of its lawful purposes or functions.24    (c) Expenditures may be made from the Fund only as 25appropriated by the General Assembly by law.  HB2749- 15 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (d) Investment income that is attributable to the 2investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 3for the uses specified in this Section. 4    (e) The State Police Operations Assistance Fund shall not 5be subject to administrative chargebacks. 6    (e-5) Moneys in the Fund shall be used to cover costs 7incurred by the criminal justice system to administer the Sex 8Offender Registration and the Murderer and Violent Offender 9Against Youth Registration Act. Fifty percent of the moneys 10received from Sections 3 and 10 of the Sex Offender 11Registration Act and Sections 10 and 60 of the Murder and 12Violent Offender Against Youth Registration Act shall be 13allocated by the Illinois State Police for sheriffs' offices 14and police departments. 15    (e-10) Moneys in the Fund shall be used to produce 16materials to educate drivers on approaching stationary 17authorized emergency vehicles, to hire off-duty Illinois State 18Police personnel for enforcement of Section 11-907 of the 19Illinois Vehicle Code, and for other law enforcement purposes 20the Director of the Illinois State Police deems necessary in 21these efforts. 22    (f) (Blank).23    (g) (Blank). 24    (h) (Blank). June 9, 2023 (Public Act 103-34)25    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 26contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be   HB2749- 16 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 2of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 3practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 4Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the Drug 5Traffic Prevention Fund into the State Police Operations 6Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the Drug 7Traffic Prevention Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits 8due to that Fund and any outstanding obligations or 9liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the State Police 10Operations Assistance Fund.11    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 12contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 13provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 14of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 15practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 16Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the State 17Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund into the State Police 18Operations Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, 19the State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund is dissolved, 20and any future deposits due to that Fund and any outstanding 21obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the 22State Police Operations Assistance Fund.23    (k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 24contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 25provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 26of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as   HB2749- 17 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 2Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the 3Offender Registration Fund into the State Police Operations 4Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the Offender 5Registration Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits due to 6that Fund and any outstanding obligations or liabilities of 7that Fund shall pass to the State Police Operations Assistance 8Fund.9    (l) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 10contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 11provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 13practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 14Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the State 15Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund into the State 16Police Operations Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the 17transfer, the State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection 18Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits due to that Fund and 19any outstanding obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall 20pass to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund.21    (m) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 22contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 23provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 24of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 25practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 26Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the   HB2749- 18 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Scott's Law Fund into the State Police Operations Assistance 2Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the Scott's Law Fund is 3dissolved, and any future deposits due to that Fund and any 4outstanding obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall pass 5to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund. 6(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 86-9-23; 103-363, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-616, 9eff. 7-1-24; revised 7-23-24.) 10    (30 ILCS 105/6z-106)11    Sec. 6z-106. State Police Law Enforcement Administration 12Fund.13    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 14known as the State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund. 15The Fund shall receive revenue under subsection (c) of Section 1610-5 of the Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act, and Section 17500-135 of the Illinois Insurance Code, and Section 2605-375 18of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative 19Code of Illinois. The Fund shall also receive the moneys 20designated to be paid into the Fund under subsection (a-5) of 21Section 500-135 of the Illinois Insurance Code and Section 8.6 22of the Illinois Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft 23Prevention and Insurance Verification Act. The Fund may also 24receive revenue from grants, donations, appropriations, and 25any other legal source.  HB2749- 19 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (a-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 2contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 3provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 4of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 5practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 6Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the LEADS 7Maintenance Fund into the State Police Law Enforcement 8Administration Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the 9LEADS Maintenance Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits 10due to that Fund and any outstanding obligations or 11liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the State Police Law 12Enforcement Administration Fund. 13    (a-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 14contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 15provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 16of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 17practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 18Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the Money 19Laundering Asset Recovery Fund into the State Police Law 20Enforcement Administration Fund. Upon completion of the 21transfer, the Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund is 22dissolved, and any future deposits due to that Fund and any 23outstanding obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall pass 24to the State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund. 25    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 26finance any of its lawful purposes or functions, including,   HB2749- 20 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1but not limited to, training for forensic laboratory personnel 2and other State Police personnel. The Illinois State Police 3may also use moneys for functions in relation to defraying the 4expenses associated with establishing, maintaining, and 5supporting the issuance of electronic citations. However, the 6primary purpose of the Fund shall be to finance State Police 7cadet classes. 8    (c) Expenditures may be made from the Fund only as 9appropriated by the General Assembly by law.10    (d) Investment income that is attributable to the 11investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 12for the uses specified in this Section.13    (e) The State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund 14shall not be subject to administrative chargebacks.15(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 16    (30 ILCS 105/6z-127)17    Sec. 6z-127. State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.18    (a) The State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund is 19established as a special fund in the State treasury. This Fund 20is established to receive moneys from the Firearm Owners 21Identification Card Act to enforce that Act, the Firearm 22Concealed Carry Act, Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 23and other firearm offenses. The Fund may also receive revenue 24from grants, donations, appropriations, and any other legal 25source.  HB2749- 21 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys from the Fund 2to establish task forces and, if necessary, include other law 3enforcement agencies, under intergovernmental contracts 4written and executed in conformity with the Intergovernmental 5Cooperation Act.6    (c) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 7hire and train State Police officers and for the prevention of 8violent crime.9    (d) The State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund is not 10subject to administrative chargebacks.11    (e) Law enforcement agencies that participate in Firearm 12Owner's Identification Card revocation enforcement in the 13Violent Crime Intelligence Task Force may apply for grants 14from the Illinois State Police.15    (f) Any surplus in the Fund beyond what is necessary to 16ensure compliance with subsections (a) through (e) or moneys 17that are specifically appropriated for those purposes shall be 18used by the Illinois State Police to award grants to assist 19with the data reporting requirements of the Gun Trafficking 20Information Act. 21    (g) This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 22remaining balance from the State Police Firearm Enforcement 23Fund to the State Police Firearm Services Fund as provided 24under subsection (a-10) of Section 2605-595 of the Illinois 25State Police Law. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 26(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22;   HB2749- 22 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 2    (30 ILCS 105/8.37)3    Sec. 8.37. State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund. 4    (a) The State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund is 5created as a special fund in the State Treasury.6    (b) Grants or surcharge funds allocated to the Illinois 7State Police from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund shall be deposited 8into the State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund and 9shall be used in accordance with Section 30 of the Emergency 10Telephone System Act.11    (c) On July 1, 1999, the State Comptroller and State 12Treasurer shall transfer $1,300,000 from the General Revenue 13Fund to the State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund. On 14June 30, 2003 the State Comptroller and State Treasurer shall 15transfer $1,300,000 from the State Police Wireless Service 16Emergency Fund to the General Revenue Fund.17    (d) This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 18remaining balance from the State Police Wireless Service 19Emergency Fund to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 20as provided under subsection (j) of Section 6z-82 of the State 21Finance Act. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 22(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 23    Section 15. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 24amended by changing Section 5 as follows:   HB2749- 23 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (430 ILCS 65/5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-5)2    Sec. 5. Application and renewal. 3    (a) The Illinois State Police shall either approve or deny 4all applications within 30 days from the date they are 5received, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), and 6every applicant found qualified under Section 8 of this Act by 7the Illinois State Police shall be entitled to a Firearm 8Owner's Identification Card upon the payment of a $10 fee and 9applicable processing fees. The processing fees shall be 10limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 11electronic online payment system. Any applicant who is an 12active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a 13member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 14Reserve Forces of the United States is exempt from the 15application fee. $10 $5 of each fee derived from the issuance 16of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card or renewals thereof 17shall be deposited in the State Police Firearm Services Fund 18and $5 into the State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.19    (b) Renewal applications shall be approved or denied 20within 60 business days, provided the applicant submitted his 21or her renewal application prior to the expiration of his or 22her Firearm Owner's Identification Card. If a renewal 23application has been submitted prior to the expiration date of 24the applicant's Firearm Owner's Identification Card, the 25Firearm Owner's Identification Card shall remain valid while   HB2749- 24 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1the Illinois State Police processes the application, unless 2the person is subject to or becomes subject to revocation 3under this Act. The cost for a renewal application shall be $10 4and may include applicable processing fees, which shall be 5limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 6electronic online payment system, which shall be deposited 7into the State Police Firearm Services Fund.8    (c) If the Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 9licensee under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act expires during 10the term of the licensee's concealed carry license, the 11Firearm Owner's Identification Card and the license remain 12valid and the licensee does not have to renew his or her 13Firearm Owner's Identification Card during the duration of the 14concealed carry license. Unless the Illinois State Police has 15reason to believe the licensee is no longer eligible for the 16card, the Illinois State Police may automatically renew the 17licensee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card and send a 18renewed Firearm Owner's Identification Card to the licensee.19    (d) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules concerning 20the use of voluntarily submitted fingerprints, as allowed by 21State and federal law. 22(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    Section 20. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 25changing Section 11-907 as follows:   HB2749- 25 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (625 ILCS 5/11-907)2    Sec. 11-907. Operation of vehicles and streetcars on 3approach of authorized emergency vehicles.4    (a) Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency 5vehicle making use of audible and visual signals meeting the 6requirements of this Code or a police vehicle properly and 7lawfully making use of an audible or visual signal:8        (1) the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the 9    right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position 10    parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand 11    edge or curb of the highway clear of any intersection and 12    shall, if necessary to permit the safe passage of the 13    emergency vehicle, stop and remain in such position until 14    the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, unless 15    otherwise directed by a police officer; and16        (2) the operator of every streetcar shall immediately 17    stop such car clear of any intersection and keep it in such 18    position until the authorized emergency vehicle has 19    passed, unless otherwise directed by a police officer.20    (b) This Section shall not operate to relieve the driver 21of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with 22due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.23    (c) Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency 24vehicle or emergency scene, when the stationary authorized 25emergency vehicle is giving a visual signal by displaying   HB2749- 26 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights as authorized under 2Section 12-215 of this Code, a person who drives an 3approaching vehicle shall:4        (1) proceeding with due caution, yield the 5    right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not 6    adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if 7    possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, 8    if on a highway having at least 4 lanes with not less than 9    2 lanes proceeding in the same direction as the 10    approaching vehicle and reduce the speed of the vehicle to 11    a speed that is reasonable and proper with regard to 12    traffic conditions and the use of the highway to avoid a 13    collision and leaving a safe distance until safely past 14    the stationary emergency vehicle; or15        (2) if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe, 16    proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the 17    vehicle to a speed that is reasonable and proper with 18    regard to traffic conditions and the use of the highway to 19    avoid a collision, maintaining a safe speed for road 20    conditions and leaving a safe distance until safely past 21    the stationary emergency vehicles.22    The visual signal specified under this subsection (c) 23given by a stationary authorized emergency vehicle is an 24indication to drivers of approaching vehicles that a hazardous 25condition is present when circumstances are not immediately 26clear. Drivers of vehicles approaching a stationary authorized   HB2749- 27 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1emergency vehicle in any lane shall heed the warning of the 2signal, reduce the speed of the vehicle, proceed with due 3caution, maintain a safe speed for road conditions, be 4prepared to stop, and leave a safe distance until safely 5passed the stationary emergency vehicle. 6    As used in this subsection (c), "authorized emergency 7vehicle" includes any vehicle authorized by law to be equipped 8with oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights under Section 912-215 of this Code, while the owner or operator of the vehicle 10is engaged in his or her official duties. As used in this 11subsection (c), "emergency scene" means a location where a 12stationary authorized emergency vehicle as defined by herein 13is present and has activated its oscillating, rotating, or 14flashing lights. 15    (d) A person who violates subsection (c) of this Section 16commits a business offense punishable by a fine of not less 17than $250 or more than $10,000 for a first violation, and a 18fine of not less than $750 or more than $10,000 for a second or 19subsequent violation. It is a factor in aggravation if the 20person committed the offense while in violation of Section 2111-501, 12-610.1, or 12-610.2 of this Code. Imposition of the 22penalties authorized by this subsection (d) for a violation of 23subsection (c) of this Section that results in the death of 24another person does not preclude imposition of appropriate 25additional civil or criminal penalties. A person who violates 26subsection (c) and the violation results in damage to another   HB2749- 28 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1vehicle commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person who violates 2subsection (c) and the violation results in the injury or 3death of another person commits a Class 4 felony.4    (e) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 5results in damage to the property of another person, in 6addition to any other penalty imposed, the person's driving 7privileges shall be suspended for a fixed period of not less 8than 90 days and not more than one year.9    (f) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 10results in injury to another person, in addition to any other 11penalty imposed, the person's driving privileges shall be 12suspended for a fixed period of not less than 180 days and not 13more than 2 years.14    (g) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 15results in the death of another person, in addition to any 16other penalty imposed, the person's driving privileges shall 17be suspended for 2 years.18    (h) The Secretary of State shall, upon receiving a record 19of a judgment entered against a person under subsection (c) of 20this Section:21        (1) suspend the person's driving privileges for the 22    mandatory period; or23        (2) extend the period of an existing suspension by the 24    appropriate mandatory period.25    (i) The Scott's Law Fund shall be a special fund in the 26State treasury. Subject to appropriation by the General   HB2749- 29 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Assembly and approval by the Director, the Director of the 2Illinois State Police shall use all moneys in the State Police 3Operations Assistance Fund Scott's Law Fund in the 4Department's discretion to fund the production of materials to 5educate drivers on approaching stationary authorized emergency 6vehicles, to hire off-duty Illinois State Police personnel for 7enforcement of this Section, and for other law enforcement 8purposes the Director deems necessary in these efforts.9    (j) For violations of this Section issued by a county or 10municipal police officer, the assessment shall be deposited 11into the county's or municipality's Transportation Safety 12Highway Hire-back Fund. The county shall use the moneys in its 13Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund to hire off-duty 14county police officers to monitor construction or maintenance 15zones in that county on highways other than interstate 16highways. The county, in its discretion, may also use a 17portion of the moneys in its Transportation Safety Highway 18Hire-back Fund to purchase equipment for county law 19enforcement and fund the production of materials to educate 20drivers on construction zone safe driving habits and 21approaching stationary authorized emergency vehicles. 22    (k) In addition to other penalties imposed by this 23Section, the court may order a person convicted of a violation 24of subsection (c) to perform community service as determined 25by the court. 26(Source: P.A. 102-336, eff. 1-1-22; 102-338, eff. 1-1-22;   HB2749- 30 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-667, eff. 1-1-25; 103-711, eff. 21-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 3    Section 25. The Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act is 4amended by changing Section 15-70 as follows: 5    (705 ILCS 135/15-70)6    Sec. 15-70. Conditional assessments. In addition to 7payments under one of the Schedule of Assessments 1 through 13 8of this Act, the court shall also order payment of any of the 9following conditional assessment amounts for each sentenced 10violation in the case to which a conditional assessment is 11applicable, which shall be collected and remitted by the Clerk 12of the Circuit Court as provided in this Section:13        (1) arson, residential arson, or aggravated arson, 14    $500 per conviction to the State Treasurer for deposit 15    into the Fire Prevention Fund;16        (2) child pornography under Section 11-20.1 of the 17    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, $500 18    per conviction, unless more than one agency is responsible 19    for the arrest in which case the amount shall be remitted 20    to each unit of government equally:21            (A) if the arresting agency is an agency of a unit 22        of local government, $500 to the treasurer of the unit 23        of local government for deposit into the unit of local 24        government's General Fund, except that if the Illinois   HB2749- 31 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        State Police provides digital or electronic forensic 2        examination assistance, or both, to the arresting 3        agency then $100 to the State Treasurer for deposit 4        into the State Crime Laboratory Fund; or5            (B) if the arresting agency is the Illinois State 6        Police, $500 to the State Treasurer for deposit into 7        the State Crime Laboratory Fund;8        (3) crime laboratory drug analysis for a drug-related 9    offense involving possession or delivery of cannabis or 10    possession or delivery of a controlled substance as 11    defined in the Cannabis Control Act, the Illinois 12    Controlled Substances Act, or the Methamphetamine Control 13    and Community Protection Act, $100 reimbursement for 14    laboratory analysis, as set forth in subsection (f) of 15    Section 5-9-1.4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;16        (4) DNA analysis, $250 on each conviction in which it 17    was used to the State Treasurer for deposit into the State 18    Crime Laboratory Fund as set forth in Section 5-9-1.4 of 19    the Unified Code of Corrections;20        (5) DUI analysis, $150 on each sentenced violation in 21    which it was used as set forth in subsection (f) of Section 22    5-9-1.9 of the Unified Code of Corrections;23        (6) drug-related offense involving possession or 24    delivery of cannabis or possession or delivery of a 25    controlled substance, other than methamphetamine, as 26    defined in the Cannabis Control Act or the Illinois   HB2749- 32 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    Controlled Substances Act, an amount not less than the 2    full street value of the cannabis or controlled substance 3    seized for each conviction to be disbursed as follows:4            (A) 12.5% of the street value assessment shall be 5        paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, to be 6        used by the Department of Human Services for the 7        funding of programs and services for drug-abuse 8        treatment, and prevention and education services;9            (B) 37.5% to the county in which the charge was 10        prosecuted, to be deposited into the county General 11        Fund;12            (C) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 13        enforcement agency of the municipality or county, or 14        to the State Treasurer if the arresting agency was a 15        state agency, to be deposited as provided in 16        subsection (c) of Section 10-5;17            (D) if the arrest was made in combination with 18        multiple law enforcement agencies, the clerk shall 19        equitably allocate the portion in subparagraph (C) of 20        this paragraph (6) among the law enforcement agencies 21        involved in the arrest;22        (6.5) Kane County or Will County, in felony, 23    misdemeanor, local or county ordinance, traffic, or 24    conservation cases, up to $30 as set by the county board 25    under Section 5-1101.3 of the Counties Code upon the entry 26    of a judgment of conviction, an order of supervision, or a   HB2749- 33 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    sentence of probation without entry of judgment under 2    Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 3    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 4    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 5    Section 12-4.3 or paragraph (1) of subsection (b) 6    subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 of the Criminal Code 7    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the 8    Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, or 9    Section 10 of the Steroid Control Act; except in local or 10    county ordinance, traffic, and conservation cases, if 11    fines are paid in full without a court appearance, then 12    the assessment shall not be imposed or collected. 13    Distribution of assessments collected under this paragraph 14    (6.5) shall be as provided in Section 5-1101.3 of the 15    Counties Code;16        (7) methamphetamine-related offense involving 17    possession or delivery of methamphetamine or any salt of 18    an optical isomer of methamphetamine or possession of a 19    methamphetamine manufacturing material as set forth in 20    Section 10 of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 21    Protection Act with the intent to manufacture a substance 22    containing methamphetamine or salt of an optical isomer of 23    methamphetamine, an amount not less than the full street 24    value of the methamphetamine or salt of an optical isomer 25    of methamphetamine or methamphetamine manufacturing 26    materials seized for each conviction to be disbursed as   HB2749- 34 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    follows:2            (A) 12.5% of the street value assessment shall be 3        paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, to be 4        used by the Department of Human Services for the 5        funding of programs and services for drug-abuse 6        treatment, and prevention and education services;7            (B) 37.5% to the county in which the charge was 8        prosecuted, to be deposited into the county General 9        Fund;10            (C) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 11        enforcement agency of the municipality or county, or 12        to the State Treasurer if the arresting agency was a 13        state agency, to be deposited as provided in 14        subsection (c) of Section 10-5;15            (D) if the arrest was made in combination with 16        multiple law enforcement agencies, the clerk shall 17        equitably allocate the portion in subparagraph (C) of 18        this paragraph (6) among the law enforcement agencies 19        involved in the arrest;20        (8) order of protection violation under Section 12-3.4 21    of the Criminal Code of 2012, $200 for each conviction to 22    the county treasurer for deposit into the Probation and 23    Court Services Fund for implementation of a domestic 24    violence surveillance program and any other assessments or 25    fees imposed under Section 5-9-1.16 of the Unified Code of 26    Corrections;  HB2749- 35 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        (9) order of protection violation, $25 for each 2    violation to the State Treasurer, for deposit into the 3    Domestic Violence Abuser Services Fund;4        (10) prosecution by the State's Attorney of a:5            (A) petty or business offense, $4 to the county 6        treasurer of which $2 deposited into the State's 7        Attorney Records Automation Fund and $2 into the 8        Public Defender Records Automation Fund;9            (B) conservation or traffic offense, $2 to the 10        county treasurer for deposit into the State's Attorney 11        Records Automation Fund;12        (11) speeding in a construction zone violation, $250 13    to the State Treasurer for deposit into the Transportation 14    Safety Highway Hire-back Fund, unless (i) the violation 15    occurred on a highway other than an interstate highway and 16    (ii) a county police officer wrote the ticket for the 17    violation, in which case to the county treasurer for 18    deposit into that county's Transportation Safety Highway 19    Hire-back Fund;20        (12) supervision disposition on an offense under the 21    Illinois Vehicle Code or similar provision of a local 22    ordinance, 50 cents, unless waived by the court, into the 23    Prisoner Review Board Vehicle and Equipment Fund;24        (13) victim and offender are family or household 25    members as defined in Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic 26    Violence Act of 1986 and offender pleads guilty or no   HB2749- 36 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    contest to or is convicted of murder, voluntary 2    manslaughter, involuntary manslaughter, burglary, 3    residential burglary, criminal trespass to residence, 4    criminal trespass to vehicle, criminal trespass to land, 5    criminal damage to property, telephone harassment, 6    kidnapping, aggravated kidnaping, unlawful restraint, 7    forcible detention, child abduction, indecent solicitation 8    of a child, sexual relations between siblings, 9    exploitation of a child, child pornography, assault, 10    aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, heinous 11    battery, aggravated battery of a child, domestic battery, 12    reckless conduct, intimidation, criminal sexual assault, 13    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 14    criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual abuse, aggravated 15    criminal sexual abuse, violation of an order of 16    protection, disorderly conduct, endangering the life or 17    health of a child, child abandonment, contributing to 18    dependency or neglect of child, or cruelty to children and 19    others, $200 for each sentenced violation to the State 20    Treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) for sexual assault, 21    as defined in Section 5-9-1.7 of the Unified Code of 22    Corrections, when the offender and victim are family 23    members, one-half to the Domestic Violence Shelter and 24    Service Fund, and one-half to the Sexual Assault Services 25    Fund; (ii) for the remaining offenses to the Domestic 26    Violence Shelter and Service Fund;  HB2749- 37 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        (14) violation of Section 11-501 of the Illinois 2    Vehicle Code, Section 5-7 of the Snowmobile Registration 3    and Safety Act, Section 5-16 of the Boat Registration and 4    Safety Act, or a similar provision, whose operation of a 5    motor vehicle, snowmobile, or watercraft while in 6    violation of Section 11-501, Section 5-7 of the Snowmobile 7    Registration and Safety Act, Section 5-16 of the Boat 8    Registration and Safety Act, or a similar provision 9    proximately caused an incident resulting in an appropriate 10    emergency response, $1,000 maximum to the public agency 11    that provided an emergency response related to the 12    person's violation, or as provided in subsection (c) of 13    Section 10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, 14    unless more than one agency was responsible for the 15    arrest, in which case the amount shall be remitted to each 16    unit of government equally;17        (15) violation of Section 401, 407, or 407.2 of the 18    Illinois Controlled Substances Act that proximately caused 19    any incident resulting in an appropriate drug-related 20    emergency response, $1,000 as reimbursement for the 21    emergency response to the law enforcement agency that made 22    the arrest, or as provided in subsection (c) of Section 23    10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, unless 24    more than one agency was responsible for the arrest, in 25    which case the amount shall be remitted to each unit of 26    government equally;  HB2749- 38 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        (16) violation of reckless driving, aggravated 2    reckless driving, or driving 26 miles per hour or more in 3    excess of the speed limit that triggered an emergency 4    response, $1,000 maximum reimbursement for the emergency 5    response to be distributed in its entirety to a public 6    agency that provided an emergency response related to the 7    person's violation, or as provided in subsection (c) of 8    Section 10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, 9    unless more than one agency was responsible for the 10    arrest, in which case the amount shall be remitted to each 11    unit of government equally;12        (17) violation based upon each plea of guilty, 13    stipulation of facts, or finding of guilt resulting in a 14    judgment of conviction or order of supervision for an 15    offense under Section 10-9, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, or 11-18 of 16    the Criminal Code of 2012 that results in the imposition 17    of a fine, to be distributed as follows: 18            (A) $50 to the county treasurer for deposit into 19        the Circuit Court Clerk Operation and Administrative 20        Fund to cover the costs in administering this 21        paragraph (17); 22            (B) $300 to the State Treasurer who shall deposit 23        the portion as follows: 24                (i) if the arresting or investigating agency 25            is the Illinois State Police, into the State 26            Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund;   HB2749- 39 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1                (ii) if the arresting or investigating agency 2            is the Department of Natural Resources, into the 3            Conservation Police Operations Assistance Fund; 4                (iii) if the arresting or investigating agency 5            is the Secretary of State, into the Secretary of 6            State Police Services Fund; 7                (iv) if the arresting or investigating agency 8            is the Illinois Commerce Commission, into the 9            Transportation Regulatory Fund; or 10                (v) if more than one of the State agencies in 11            this subparagraph (B) is the arresting or 12            investigating agency, then equal shares with the 13            shares deposited as provided in the applicable 14            items (i) through (iv) of this subparagraph (B); 15            and16            (C) the remainder for deposit into the Specialized 17        Services for Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund; 18        (18) weapons violation under Section 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 19    or 24-1.5 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 20    of 2012, $100 for each conviction to the State Treasurer 21    for deposit into the Trauma Center Fund; and22        (19) violation of subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of 23    the Illinois Vehicle Code, $250 to the State Treasurer for 24    deposit into the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 25    Scott's Law Fund, unless a county or municipal police 26    officer wrote the ticket for the violation, in which case   HB2749- 40 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    to the county treasurer for deposit into that county's or 2    municipality's Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back 3    Fund to be used as provided in subsection (j) of Section 4    11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and .5        (20) violation of Section 15-109.1 of the Illinois 6    Vehicle Code, $150 to be distributed as follows:7            (A) 50% to the county treasurer for deposit into 8        the county general fund; and9            (B) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 10        enforcement agency of the municipality or county or to 11        the State Treasurer, if the arresting agency was a 12        State agency, to be deposited as provided in 13        subsection (c) of Section 10-5.14    Except for traffic violations, fines, and assessments, 15such as fees or administrative costs authorized in this 16Section, shall not be ordered or imposed on a minor subject to 17Article III, IV, or V of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or a 18minor under the age of 18 transferred to adult court or 19excluded from juvenile court jurisdiction under Article V of 20the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the minor's parent, 21guardian, or legal custodian. 22(Source: P.A. 102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-379, eff. 247-28-23; 103-730, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-23-24.) 25    Section 30. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by   HB2749- 41 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1changing Section 29B-26 as follows: 2    (720 ILCS 5/29B-26)3    Sec. 29B-26. Distribution of proceeds. All moneys and the 4sale proceeds of all other property forfeited and seized under 5this Article shall be distributed as follows:6        (1) 65% shall be distributed to the metropolitan 7    enforcement group, local, municipal, county, or State law 8    enforcement agency or agencies that conducted or 9    participated in the investigation resulting in the 10    forfeiture. The distribution shall bear a reasonable 11    relationship to the degree of direct participation of the 12    law enforcement agency in the effort resulting in the 13    forfeiture, taking into account the total value of the 14    property forfeited and the total law enforcement effort 15    with respect to the violation of the law upon which the 16    forfeiture is based. Amounts distributed to the agency or 17    agencies shall be used for the enforcement of laws. 18        (2)(i) 12.5% shall be distributed to the Office of the 19    State's Attorney of the county in which the prosecution 20    resulting in the forfeiture was instituted, deposited in a 21    special fund in the county treasury and appropriated to 22    the State's Attorney for use in the enforcement of laws. 23    In counties over 3,000,000 population, 25% shall be 24    distributed to the Office of the State's Attorney for use 25    in the enforcement of laws. If the prosecution is   HB2749- 42 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    undertaken solely by the Attorney General, the portion 2    provided under this subparagraph (i) shall be distributed 3    to the Attorney General for use in the enforcement of 4    laws. 5        (ii) 12.5% shall be distributed to the Office of the 6    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor and deposited in 7    the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Fund of that office to be 8    used for additional expenses incurred in the 9    investigation, prosecution, and appeal of cases arising 10    under laws. The Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 11    Prosecutor shall not receive distribution from cases 12    brought in counties with over 3,000,000 population. 13        (3) 10% shall be retained by the Illinois State Police 14    for expenses related to the administration and sale of 15    seized and forfeited property. 16    Moneys and the sale proceeds distributed to the Illinois 17State Police under this Article shall be deposited into in the 18State Police Law Enforcement Administration Money Laundering 19Asset Recovery Fund created in the State treasury and shall be 20used by the Illinois State Police for State law enforcement 21purposes. All moneys and sale proceeds of property forfeited 22and seized under this Article and distributed according to 23this Section may also be used to purchase opioid antagonists 24as defined in Section 5-23 of the Substance Use Disorder Act. 25(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB2749- 43 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    Section 35. The Cannabis Control Act is amended by 2changing Sections 8 and 10.2 as follows: 3    (720 ILCS 550/8)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 708)4    Sec. 8. Except as otherwise provided in the Cannabis 5Regulation and Tax Act and the Industrial Hemp Act, it is 6unlawful for any person knowingly to produce the Cannabis 7sativa plant or to possess such plants unless production or 8possession has been authorized pursuant to the provisions of 9Section 11 or 15.2 of the Act. Any person who violates this 10Section with respect to production or possession of:11        (a) Not more than 5 plants is guilty of a civil 12    violation punishable by a minimum fine of $100 and a 13    maximum fine of $200. The proceeds of the fine are payable 14    to the clerk of the circuit court. Within 30 days after the 15    deposit of the fine, the clerk shall distribute the 16    proceeds of the fine as follows:17            (1) $10 of the fine to the circuit clerk and $10 of 18        the fine to the law enforcement agency that issued the 19        citation; the proceeds of each $10 fine distributed to 20        the circuit clerk and each $10 fine distributed to the 21        law enforcement agency that issued the citation for 22        the violation shall be used to defer the cost of 23        automatic expungements under paragraph (2.5) of 24        subsection (a) of Section 5.2 of the Criminal 25        Identification Act;  HB2749- 44 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1            (2) $15 to the county to fund drug addiction 2        services;3            (3) $10 to the Office of the State's Attorneys 4        Appellate Prosecutor for use in training programs;5            (4) $10 to the State's Attorney; and6            (5) any remainder of the fine to the law 7        enforcement agency that issued the citation for the 8        violation.9        With respect to funds designated for the Illinois 10    State Police, the moneys shall be remitted by the circuit 11    court clerk to the State Treasurer within one month after 12    receipt for deposit into the State Police Operations 13    Assistance Fund. With respect to funds designated for the 14    Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Natural 15    Resources shall deposit the moneys into the Conservation 16    Police Operations Assistance Fund.17        (b) More than 5, but not more than 20 plants, is guilty 18    of a Class 4 felony.19        (c) More than 20, but not more than 50 plants, is 20    guilty of a Class 3 felony.21        (d) More than 50, but not more than 200 plants, is 22    guilty of a Class 2 felony for which a fine not to exceed 23    $100,000 may be imposed and for which liability for the 24    cost of conducting the investigation and eradicating such 25    plants may be assessed. Compensation for expenses incurred 26    in the enforcement of this provision shall be transmitted   HB2749- 45 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the level of 2    government represented by the Illinois law enforcement 3    agency whose officers or employees conducted the 4    investigation or caused the arrest or arrests leading to 5    the prosecution, to be subsequently made available to that 6    law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use in 7    the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 8    and cannabis. If such seizure was made by a combination of 9    law enforcement personnel representing different levels of 10    government, the court levying the assessment shall 11    determine the allocation of such assessment. The proceeds 12    of assessment awarded to the State treasury shall be 13    deposited in a special fund known as the State Police 14    Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund.15        (e) More than 200 plants is guilty of a Class 1 felony 16    for which a fine not to exceed $100,000 may be imposed and 17    for which liability for the cost of conducting the 18    investigation and eradicating such plants may be assessed. 19    Compensation for expenses incurred in the enforcement of 20    this provision shall be transmitted to and deposited in 21    the treasurer's office at the level of government 22    represented by the Illinois law enforcement agency whose 23    officers or employees conducted the investigation or 24    caused the arrest or arrests leading to the prosecution, 25    to be subsequently made available to that law enforcement 26    agency as expendable receipts for use in the enforcement   HB2749- 46 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    of laws regulating controlled substances and cannabis. If 2    such seizure was made by a combination of law enforcement 3    personnel representing different levels of government, the 4    court levying the assessment shall determine the 5    allocation of such assessment. The proceeds of assessment 6    awarded to the State treasury shall be deposited in a 7    special fund known as the State Police Operations 8    Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund. 9(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 10102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 115-13-22.) 12    (720 ILCS 550/10.2)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 710.2)13    Sec. 10.2. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts 14collected as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Act 15shall be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which 16is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 17Department of Human Services for the funding of programs and 18services for drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and 19education services, for juveniles.20    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 21all fines received under the provisions of this Act shall be 22transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the 23level of government as follows: 24        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 25    enforcement personnel representing differing units of   HB2749- 47 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    local government, the court levying the fine shall 2    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 3    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 4    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 5    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 6    local government from a municipality where the number of 7    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 8    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 9    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 10    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 11    differing units of local government, and at least one of 12    those units represents a municipality where the number of 13    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 14    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 15    fines received among the differing units of local 16    government. 17        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 18    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 19    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 20    fund. 21        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 22    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 23    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 24    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 25    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 26    units of local government which conducted the seizure and   HB2749- 48 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.2    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 3enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 4government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 5to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 6in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 7and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 8treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 9State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 10Prevention Fund, except that amounts distributed to the 11Secretary of State shall be deposited into the Secretary of 12State Evidence Fund to be used as provided in Section 2-115 of 13the Illinois Vehicle Code. Monies from this fund may be used by 14the Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 15regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 16funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 17Enforcement Act; to defray costs and expenses associated with 18returning violators of this Act, the Illinois Controlled 19Substances Act, and the Methamphetamine Control and Community 20Protection Act only, as provided in such Acts, when punishment 21of the crime shall be confinement of the criminal in the 22penitentiary; and all other monies shall be paid into the 23general revenue fund in the State treasury.24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 25    Section 40. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is   HB2749- 49 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1amended by changing Section 413 as follows: 2    (720 ILCS 570/413)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1413)3    Sec. 413. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts 4collected as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Article 5shall be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which 6is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 7Department for the funding of programs and services for 8substance use disorder treatment, and prevention and education 9services, for juveniles.10    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 11all fines received under the provisions of this Article shall 12be transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at 13the level of government as follows:14        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 15    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 16    local government, the court levying the fine shall 17    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 18    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 19    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 20    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 21    local government from a municipality where the number of 22    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 23    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 24    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 25    combination of law enforcement personnel representing   HB2749- 50 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    differing units of local government, and at least one of 2    those units represents a municipality where the number of 3    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 4    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 5    fines received among the differing units of local 6    government.7        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 8    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 9    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 10    fund.11        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 12    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 13    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 14    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 15    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 16    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 17    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.18    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 19enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 20government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 21to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 22in the enforcement of laws regulating cannabis, 23methamphetamine, and other controlled substances. The proceeds 24of fines awarded to the State treasury shall be deposited in a 25special fund known as the State Police Operations Assistance 26Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund, except that amounts   HB2749- 51 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1distributed to the Secretary of State shall be deposited into 2the Secretary of State Evidence Fund to be used as provided in 3Section 2-115 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Monies from this 4fund may be used by the Illinois State Police or use in the 5enforcement of laws regulating cannabis, methamphetamine, and 6other controlled substances; to satisfy funding provisions of 7the Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement Act; to defray 8costs and expenses associated with returning violators of the 9Cannabis Control Act and this Act only, as provided in those 10Acts, when punishment of the crime shall be confinement of the 11criminal in the penitentiary; and all other monies shall be 12paid into the general revenue fund in the State treasury.13(Source: P.A. 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.) 14    Section 45. The Methamphetamine Control and Community 15Protection Act is amended by changing Section 95 as follows: 16    (720 ILCS 646/95)17    Sec. 95. Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund. 18    (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts collected 19as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Article shall be 20paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund created by the 21Controlled Substances Act in the State treasury, to be used by 22the Department for the funding of programs and services for 23drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and education services, 24for juveniles.   HB2749- 52 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 2all fines received under the provisions of this Act shall be 3transmitted to and deposited into the State treasury and 4distributed as follows: 5        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 6    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 7    local government, the court levying the fine shall 8    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 9    local government and shall allocate 37.5% to the county 10    general corporate fund. If the seizure was made by law 11    enforcement personnel representing a unit of local 12    government from a municipality where the number of 13    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 14    levying the fine shall allocate 87.5% of the fine to that 15    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 16    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 17    differing units of local government and if at least one of 18    those units represents a municipality where the number of 19    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 20    shall equitably allocate 87.5% of the proceeds of the 21    fines received among the differing units of local 22    government. 23        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 24    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37.5% to the 25    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 26    fund.   HB2749- 53 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 2    with any law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 3    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 4    shall equitably allocate 37.5% of the fines to or among 5    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 6    units of local government that conducted the seizure and 7    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund. 8    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 9enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 10government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 11to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 12in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 13and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 14treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 15State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 16Prevention Fund, except that amounts distributed to the 17Secretary of State shall be deposited into the Secretary of 18State Evidence Fund to be used as provided in Section 2-115 of 19the Illinois Vehicle Code. Moneys from this Fund may be used by 20the Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 21regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 22funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 23Enforcement Act; to defray costs and expenses associated with 24returning violators of the Cannabis Control Act and this Act 25only, as provided in those Acts, when punishment of the crime 26shall be confinement of the criminal in the penitentiary; and   HB2749- 54 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1all other moneys shall be paid into the General Revenue Fund in 2the State treasury.3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    Section 50. The Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act is amended 5by changing Sections 5 and 5.2 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 175/5)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1655)7    Sec. 5. (a) A person who commits the offense of narcotics 8racketeering shall:9        (1) be guilty of a Class 1 felony; and10        (2) be subject to a fine of up to $250,000.11    A person who commits the offense of narcotics racketeering 12or who violates Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control 13Act shall forfeit to the State of Illinois: (A) any profits or 14proceeds and any property or property interest he has acquired 15or maintained in violation of this Act or Section 3 of the Drug 16Paraphernalia Control Act or has used to facilitate a 17violation of this Act that the court determines, after a 18forfeiture hearing, under subsection (b) of this Section to 19have been acquired or maintained as a result of narcotics 20racketeering or violating Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia 21Control Act, or used to facilitate narcotics racketeering; and 22(B) any interest in, security of, claim against, or property 23or contractual right of any kind affording a source of 24influence over, any enterprise which he has established,   HB2749- 55 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1operated, controlled, conducted, or participated in the 2conduct of, in violation of this Act or Section 3 of the Drug 3Paraphernalia Control Act, that the court determines, after a 4forfeiture hearing, under subsection (b) of this Section to 5have been acquired or maintained as a result of narcotics 6racketeering or violating Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia 7Control Act or used to facilitate narcotics racketeering.8    (b) The court shall, upon petition by the Attorney General 9or State's Attorney, at any time subsequent to the filing of an 10information or return of an indictment, conduct a hearing to 11determine whether any property or property interest is subject 12to forfeiture under this Act. At the forfeiture hearing the 13people shall have the burden of establishing, by a 14preponderance of the evidence, that property or property 15interests are subject to forfeiture under this Act. There is a 16rebuttable presumption at such hearing that any property or 17property interest of a person charged by information or 18indictment with narcotics racketeering or who is convicted of 19a violation of Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act 20is subject to forfeiture under this Section if the State 21establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that:22        (1) such property or property interest was acquired by 23    such person during the period of the violation of this Act 24    or Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act or 25    within a reasonable time after such period; and26        (2) there was no likely source for such property or   HB2749- 56 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    property interest other than the violation of this Act or 2    Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act.3    (c) In an action brought by the People of the State of 4Illinois under this Act, wherein any restraining order, 5injunction or prohibition or any other action in connection 6with any property or property interest subject to forfeiture 7under this Act is sought, the circuit court which shall 8preside over the trial of the person or persons charged with 9narcotics racketeering as defined in Section 4 of this Act or 10violating Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act 11shall first determine whether there is probable cause to 12believe that the person or persons so charged has committed 13the offense of narcotics racketeering as defined in Section 4 14of this Act or a violation of Section 3 of the Drug 15Paraphernalia Control Act and whether the property or property 16interest is subject to forfeiture pursuant to this Act.17    In order to make such a determination, prior to entering 18any such order, the court shall conduct a hearing without a 19jury, wherein the People shall establish that there is: (i) 20probable cause that the person or persons so charged have 21committed the offense of narcotics racketeering or violating 22Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act and (ii) 23probable cause that any property or property interest may be 24subject to forfeiture pursuant to this Act. Such hearing may 25be conducted simultaneously with a preliminary hearing, if the 26prosecution is commenced by information or complaint, or by   HB2749- 57 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1motion of the People, at any stage in the proceedings. The 2court may accept a finding of probable cause at a preliminary 3hearing following the filing of an information charging the 4offense of narcotics racketeering as defined in Section 4 of 5this Act or the return of an indictment by a grand jury 6charging the offense of narcotics racketeering as defined in 7Section 4 of this Act or after a charge is filed for violating 8Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act as sufficient 9evidence of probable cause as provided in item (i) above.10    Upon such a finding, the circuit court shall enter such 11restraining order, injunction or prohibition, or shall take 12such other action in connection with any such property or 13property interest subject to forfeiture under this Act, as is 14necessary to insure that such property is not removed from the 15jurisdiction of the court, concealed, destroyed or otherwise 16disposed of by the owner of that property or property interest 17prior to a forfeiture hearing under subsection (b) of this 18Section. The Attorney General or State's Attorney shall file a 19certified copy of such restraining order, injunction or other 20prohibition with the recorder of deeds or registrar of titles 21of each county where any such property of the defendant may be 22located. No such injunction, restraining order or other 23prohibition shall affect the rights of any bona fide 24purchaser, mortgagee, judgment creditor or other lien holder 25arising prior to the date of such filing.26    The court may, at any time, upon verified petition by the   HB2749- 58 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1defendant, conduct a hearing to release all or portions of any 2such property or interest which the court previously 3determined to be subject to forfeiture or subject to any 4restraining order, injunction, or prohibition or other action. 5The court may release such property to the defendant for good 6cause shown and within the sound discretion of the court.7    (d) Prosecution under this Act may be commenced by the 8Attorney General or a State's Attorney.9    (e) Upon an order of forfeiture being entered pursuant to 10subsection (b) of this Section, the court shall authorize the 11Attorney General to seize any property or property interest 12declared forfeited under this Act and under such terms and 13conditions as the court shall deem proper. Any property or 14property interest that has been the subject of an entered 15restraining order, injunction or prohibition or any other 16action filed under subsection (c) shall be forfeited unless 17the claimant can show by a preponderance of the evidence that 18the property or property interest has not been acquired or 19maintained as a result of narcotics racketeering or has not 20been used to facilitate narcotics racketeering.21    (f) The Attorney General or his designee is authorized to 22sell all property forfeited and seized pursuant to this Act, 23unless such property is required by law to be destroyed or is 24harmful to the public, and, after the deduction of all 25requisite expenses of administration and sale, shall 26distribute the proceeds of such sale, along with any moneys   HB2749- 59 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1forfeited or seized, in accordance with subsection (g) or (h), 2whichever is applicable.3    (g) All monies and the sale proceeds of all other property 4forfeited and seized pursuant to this Act shall be distributed 5as follows:6        (1) An amount equal to 50% shall be distributed to the 7    unit of local government whose officers or employees 8    conducted the investigation into narcotics racketeering 9    and caused the arrest or arrests and prosecution leading 10    to the forfeiture. Amounts distributed to units of local 11    government shall be used for enforcement of laws governing 12    narcotics activity or for public education in the 13    community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 14    abuse of drugs or alcohol. In the event, however, that the 15    investigation, arrest or arrests and prosecution leading 16    to the forfeiture were undertaken solely by a State 17    agency, the portion provided hereunder shall be paid into 18    the State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 19    Prevention Fund in the State treasury to be used for 20    enforcement of laws governing narcotics activity.21        (2) An amount equal to 12.5% shall be distributed to 22    the county in which the prosecution resulting in the 23    forfeiture was instituted, deposited in a special fund in 24    the county treasury and appropriated to the State's 25    Attorney for use in the enforcement of laws governing 26    narcotics activity or for public education in the   HB2749- 60 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 2    abuse of drugs or alcohol.3        An amount equal to 12.5% shall be distributed to the 4    Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor and 5    deposited in the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Fund, which 6    is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 7    Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor for 8    additional expenses incurred in prosecuting appeals 9    arising under this Act. Any amounts remaining in the Fund 10    after all additional expenses have been paid shall be used 11    by the Office to reduce the participating county 12    contributions to the Office on a pro-rated basis as 13    determined by the board of governors of the Office of the 14    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor based on the 15    populations of the participating counties.16        (3) An amount equal to 25% shall be paid into the State 17    Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention 18    Fund in the State treasury to be used by the Illinois State 19    Police for funding Metropolitan Enforcement Groups created 20    pursuant to the Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement 21    Act. Any amounts remaining in the Fund after full funding 22    of Metropolitan Enforcement Groups shall be used for 23    enforcement, by the State or any unit of local government, 24    of laws governing narcotics activity or for public 25    education in the community or schools in the prevention or 26    detection of the abuse of drugs or alcohol.  HB2749- 61 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (h) Where the investigation or indictment for the offense 2of narcotics racketeering or a violation of Section 3 of the 3Drug Paraphernalia Control Act has occurred under the 4provisions of the Statewide Grand Jury Act, all monies and the 5sale proceeds of all other property shall be distributed as 6follows:7        (1) 60% shall be distributed to the metropolitan 8    enforcement group, local, municipal, county, or State law 9    enforcement agency or agencies which conducted or 10    participated in the investigation resulting in the 11    forfeiture. The distribution shall bear a reasonable 12    relationship to the degree of direct participation of the 13    law enforcement agency in the effort resulting in the 14    forfeiture, taking into account the total value of the 15    property forfeited and the total law enforcement effort 16    with respect to the violation of the law on which the 17    forfeiture is based. Amounts distributed to the agency or 18    agencies shall be used for the enforcement of laws 19    governing cannabis and controlled substances or for public 20    education in the community or schools in the prevention or 21    detection of the abuse of drugs or alcohol.22        (2) 25% shall be distributed by the Attorney General 23    as grants to drug education, treatment and prevention 24    programs licensed or approved by the Department of Human 25    Services. In making these grants, the Attorney General 26    shall take into account the plans and service priorities   HB2749- 62 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    of, and the needs identified by, the Department of Human 2    Services.3        (3) 15% shall be distributed to the Attorney General 4    and the State's Attorney, if any, participating in the 5    prosecution resulting in the forfeiture. The distribution 6    shall bear a reasonable relationship to the degree of 7    direct participation in the prosecution of the offense, 8    taking into account the total value of the property 9    forfeited and the total amount of time spent in preparing 10    and presenting the case, the complexity of the case and 11    other similar factors. Amounts distributed to the Attorney 12    General under this paragraph shall be retained in a fund 13    held by the State Treasurer as ex-officio custodian to be 14    designated as the Statewide Grand Jury Prosecution Fund 15    and paid out upon the direction of the Attorney General 16    for expenses incurred in criminal prosecutions arising 17    under the Statewide Grand Jury Act. Amounts distributed to 18    a State's Attorney shall be deposited in a special fund in 19    the county treasury and appropriated to the State's 20    Attorney for use in the enforcement of laws governing 21    narcotics activity or for public education in the 22    community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 23    abuse of drugs or alcohol.24    (i) All monies deposited pursuant to this Act in the State 25Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund 26established under Section 5-9-1.2 of the Unified Code of   HB2749- 63 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Corrections are appropriated, on a continuing basis, to the 2Illinois State Police to be used for funding Metropolitan 3Enforcement Groups created pursuant to the Intergovernmental 4Drug Laws Enforcement Act or otherwise for the enforcement of 5laws governing narcotics activity or for public education in 6the community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 7abuse of drugs or alcohol.8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 9    (725 ILCS 175/5.2)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1655.2)10    Sec. 5.2. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts 11collected as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Act 12shall be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which 13is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 14Department of Human Services for the funding of programs and 15services for drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and 16education services, for juveniles.17    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 18all fines received under the provisions of this Act shall be 19transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the 20level of government as follows: 21        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 22    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 23    local government, the court levying the fine shall 24    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 25    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county   HB2749- 64 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 2    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 3    local government from a municipality where the number of 4    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 5    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 6    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 7    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 8    differing units of local government, and at least one of 9    those units represents a municipality where the number of 10    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 11    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 12    fines received among the differing units of local 13    government. 14        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 15    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 16    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 17    fund. 18        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 19    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 20    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 21    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 22    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 23    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 24    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.25    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 26enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local   HB2749- 65 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 2to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 3in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 4and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 5treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 6State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 7Prevention Fund. Monies from this fund may be used by the 8Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 9regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 10funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 11Enforcement Act; to defray costs and expenses associated with 12returning violators of the Cannabis Control Act and the 13Illinois Controlled Substances Act only, as provided in those 14Acts, when punishment of the crime shall be confinement of the 15criminal in the penitentiary; and all other monies shall be 16paid into the general revenue fund in the State treasury.17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 18    Section 55. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 19changing Section 5-9-1.2 as follows: 20    (730 ILCS 5/5-9-1.2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-9-1.2)21    Sec. 5-9-1.2. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all 22amounts collected as fines pursuant to Section 5-9-1.1 shall 23be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which is 24hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the   HB2749- 66 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Department of Human Services for the funding of programs and 2services for drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and 3education services, for juveniles.4    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 5all fines received pursuant to Section 5-9-1.1 shall be 6transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the 7level of government as follows: 8        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 9    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 10    local government, the court levying the fine shall 11    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 12    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 13    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 14    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 15    local government from a municipality where the number of 16    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 17    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 18    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 19    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 20    differing units of local government, and at least one of 21    those units represents a municipality where the number of 22    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 23    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 24    fines received among the differing units of local 25    government. 26        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement   HB2749- 67 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 2    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 3    fund. 4        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 5    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 6    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 7    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 8    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 9    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 10    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.11    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 12enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 13government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 14to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 15in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 16and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 17treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 18State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 19Prevention Fund. Monies from this fund may be used by the 20Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 21regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 22funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 23Enforcement Act; and to defray costs and expenses associated 24with returning violators of the Cannabis Control Act, the 25Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and the Methamphetamine 26Control and Community Protection Act only, as provided in   HB2749- 68 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1those Acts, when punishment of the crime shall be confinement 2of the criminal in the penitentiary. Moneys in the State 3Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund 4deposited from fines awarded as a direct result of enforcement 5efforts of the Illinois Conservation Police may be used by the 6Department of Natural Resources Office of Law Enforcement for 7use in enforcing laws regulating controlled substances and 8cannabis on Department of Natural Resources regulated lands 9and waterways. All other monies shall be paid into the general 10revenue fund in the State treasury.11    (d) There is created in the State treasury the 12Methamphetamine Law Enforcement Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall 13be equitably allocated to local law enforcement agencies to: 14(1) reimburse those agencies for the costs of securing and 15cleaning up sites and facilities used for the illegal 16manufacture of methamphetamine; (2) defray the costs of 17employing full-time or part-time peace officers from a 18Metropolitan Enforcement Group or other local drug task force, 19including overtime costs for those officers; and (3) defray 20the costs associated with medical or dental expenses incurred 21by the county resulting from the incarceration of 22methamphetamine addicts in the county jail or County 23Department of Corrections. 24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 25    Section 60. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended   HB2749- 69 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1by changing Sections 3, 10, and 11 as follows: 2    (730 ILCS 150/3)3    Sec. 3. Duty to register. 4    (a) A sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, or 5sexual predator shall, within the time period prescribed in 6subsections (b) and (c), register in person and provide 7accurate information as required by the Illinois State Police. 8Such information shall include a current photograph, current 9address, current place of employment, the sex offender's or 10sexual predator's telephone number, including cellular 11telephone number, the employer's telephone number, school 12attended, all e-mail addresses, instant messaging identities, 13chat room identities, and other Internet communications 14identities that the sex offender uses or plans to use, all 15Uniform Resource Locators (URLs) registered or used by the sex 16offender, all blogs and other Internet sites maintained by the 17sex offender or to which the sex offender has uploaded any 18content or posted any messages or information, extensions of 19the time period for registering as provided in this Article 20and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the extension 21was granted and the date the sex offender was notified of the 22extension. The information shall also include a copy of the 23terms and conditions of parole or release signed by the sex 24offender and given to the sex offender by his or her 25supervising officer or aftercare specialist, the county of   HB2749- 70 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1conviction, license plate numbers for every vehicle registered 2in the name of the sex offender, the age of the sex offender at 3the time of the commission of the offense, the age of the 4victim at the time of the commission of the offense, and any 5distinguishing marks located on the body of the sex offender. 6A sex offender convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 711-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 8Criminal Code of 2012 shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) 9addresses in his or her residence, registered in his or her 10name, accessible at his or her place of employment, or 11otherwise under his or her control or custody. If the sex 12offender is a child sex offender as defined in Section 11-9.3 13or 11-9.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 142012, the sex offender shall report to the registering agency 15whether he or she is living in a household with a child under 1618 years of age who is not his or her own child, provided that 17his or her own child is not the victim of the sex offense. The 18sex offender or sexual predator shall register: 19        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 20    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 21    period of time of 3 or more days, unless the municipality 22    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 23    register at a fixed location designated by the 24    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 25        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 26    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time   HB2749- 71 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    of 3 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 2    incorporated, no police chief exists. 3    If the sex offender or sexual predator is employed at or 4attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall 5also register: 6        (i) with: 7            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 8        which he or she is employed at or attends an 9        institution of higher education, unless the 10        municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he 11        or she shall register at a fixed location designated 12        by the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 13        Department; or14            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she is 15        employed or attends an institution of higher education 16        located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, 17        no police chief exists; and 18        (ii) with the public safety or security director of 19    the institution of higher education which he or she is 20    employed at or attends. 21    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 22or county of primary registration, and not to campus 23registration. 24    For purposes of this Article, the place of residence or 25temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 26sex offender resides for an aggregate period of time of 3 or   HB2749- 72 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1more days during any calendar year. Any person required to 2register under this Article who lacks a fixed address or 3temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 4jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 3 days 5after ceasing to have a fixed residence.6    A sex offender or sexual predator who is temporarily 7absent from his or her current address of registration for 3 or 8more days shall notify the law enforcement agency having 9jurisdiction of his or her current registration, including the 10itinerary for travel, in the manner provided in Section 6 of 11this Act for notification to the law enforcement agency having 12jurisdiction of change of address. 13    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 14in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 15or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 16of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 17The agency of jurisdiction will document each weekly 18registration to include all the locations where the person has 19stayed during the past 7 days. 20    The sex offender or sexual predator shall provide accurate 21information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 22information shall include the sex offender's or sexual 23predator's current place of employment. 24    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 25shall, within 3 days after beginning school or employment in 26this State, register in person and provide accurate   HB2749- 73 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 2information will include current place of employment, school 3attended, and address in state of residence. A sex offender 4convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 511-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 6shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) addresses in his or 7her residence, registered in his or her name, accessible at 8his or her place of employment, or otherwise under his or her 9control or custody. The out-of-state student or out-of-state 10employee shall register: 11        (1) with:12            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 13        which he or she attends school or is employed for a 14        period of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate 15        period of time of more than 30 days during any calendar 16        year, unless the municipality is the City of Chicago, 17        in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 18        location designated by the Superintendent of the 19        Chicago Police Department; or 20            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she 21        attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 22        or more days or for an aggregate period of time of more 23        than 30 days during any calendar year in an 24        unincorporated area or, if incorporated, no police 25        chief exists; and26        (2) with the public safety or security director of the   HB2749- 74 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    institution of higher education he or she is employed at 2    or attends for a period of time of 5 or more days or for an 3    aggregate period of time of more than 30 days during a 4    calendar year.5    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 6or county of primary registration, and not to campus 7registration.8    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall 9provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 10Police. That information shall include the out-of-state 11student's current place of school attendance or the 12out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 13    (a-10) Any law enforcement agency registering sex 14offenders or sexual predators in accordance with subsections 15(a) or (a-5) of this Section shall forward to the Attorney 16General a copy of sex offender registration forms from persons 17convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 1811-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 192012, including periodic and annual registrations under 20Section 6 of this Act.21    (b) Any sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, 22or sexual predator, regardless of any initial, prior, or other 23registration, shall, within 3 days of beginning school, or 24establishing a residence, place of employment, or temporary 25domicile in any county, register in person as set forth in 26subsection (a) or (a-5).   HB2749- 75 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (c) The registration for any person required to register 2under this Article shall be as follows: 3        (1) Any person registered under the Habitual Child Sex 4    Offender Registration Act or the Child Sex Offender 5    Registration Act prior to January 1, 1996, shall be deemed 6    initially registered as of January 1, 1996; however, this 7    shall not be construed to extend the duration of 8    registration set forth in Section 7. 9        (2) Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1) or 10    (c)(4), any person convicted or adjudicated prior to 11    January 1, 1996, whose liability for registration under 12    Section 7 has not expired, shall register in person prior 13    to January 31, 1996. 14        (2.1) A sex offender or sexual predator, who has never 15    previously been required to register under this Act, has a 16    duty to register if the person has been convicted of any 17    felony offense after July 1, 2011. A person who previously 18    was required to register under this Act for a period of 10 19    years and successfully completed that registration period 20    has a duty to register if: (i) the person has been 21    convicted of any felony offense after July 1, 2011, and 22    (ii) the offense for which the 10 year registration was 23    served currently requires a registration period of more 24    than 10 years. Notification of an offender's duty to 25    register under this subsection shall be pursuant to 26    Section 5-7 of this Act.   HB2749- 76 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        (2.5) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any 2    person who has not been notified of his or her 3    responsibility to register shall be notified by a criminal 4    justice entity of his or her responsibility to register. 5    Upon notification the person must then register within 3 6    days of notification of his or her requirement to 7    register. Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1), if 8    notification is not made within the offender's 10 year 9    registration requirement, and the Illinois State Police 10    determines no evidence exists or indicates the offender 11    attempted to avoid registration, the offender will no 12    longer be required to register under this Act. 13        (3) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any 14    person convicted on or after January 1, 1996, shall 15    register in person within 3 days after the entry of the 16    sentencing order based upon his or her conviction. 17        (4) Any person unable to comply with the registration 18    requirements of this Article because he or she is 19    confined, institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on 20    or after January 1, 1996, shall register in person within 21    3 days of discharge, parole or release. 22        (5) The person shall provide positive identification 23    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at 24    the registering address. 25        (6) The person shall pay a $100 initial registration 26    fee and a $100 annual renewal fee to the registering law   HB2749- 77 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    enforcement agency having jurisdiction. The registering 2    agency may waive the registration fee if it determines 3    that the person is indigent and unable to pay the 4    registration fee. Thirty-five dollars for the initial 5    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee shall 6    be retained and used by the registering agency for 7    official purposes. Having retained $35 of the initial 8    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee, the 9    registering agency shall remit the remainder of the fee to 10    State agencies within 30 days of receipt for deposit into 11    the State funds as follows:12            (A) Five dollars of the initial registration fee 13        and $5 of the annual fee shall be remitted to the State 14        Treasurer who shall deposit the moneys into the Sex 15        Offender Management Board Fund under Section 19 of the 16        Sex Offender Management Board Act. Money deposited 17        into the Sex Offender Management Board Fund shall be 18        administered by the Sex Offender Management Board and 19        shall be used by the Board to comply with the 20        provisions of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.21            (B) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee 22        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 23        the Illinois State Police which shall deposit the 24        moneys into the State Police Operations Assistance 25        Fund Offender Registration Fund. 26            (C) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee   HB2749- 78 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 2        the Attorney General who shall deposit the moneys into 3        the Attorney General Sex Offender Awareness, Training, 4        and Education Fund. Moneys deposited into the Fund 5        shall be used by the Attorney General to administer 6        the I-SORT program and to alert and educate the 7        public, victims, and witnesses of their rights under 8        various victim notification laws and for training law 9        enforcement agencies, State's Attorneys, and medical 10        providers of their legal duties concerning the 11        prosecution and investigation of sex offenses. 12        The registering agency shall establish procedures to 13    document the receipt and remittance of the $100 initial 14    registration fee and $100 annual renewal fee. 15    (d) Within 3 days after obtaining or changing employment 16and, if employed on January 1, 2000, within 5 days after that 17date, a person required to register under this Section must 18report, in person to the law enforcement agency having 19jurisdiction, the business name and address where he or she is 20employed. If the person has multiple businesses or work 21locations, every business and work location must be reported 22to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 23(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 24    (730 ILCS 150/10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 230)25    Sec. 10. Penalty. HB2749- 79 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    (a) Any person who is required to register under this 2Article who violates any of the provisions of this Article and 3any person who is required to register under this Article who 4seeks to change his or her name under Article XXI of the Code 5of Civil Procedure is guilty of a Class 3 felony, unless, as 6provided under Section 21-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, 7that person verifies under oath that the petition for the name 8change is due to marriage, religious beliefs, status as a 9victim of trafficking or gender-related identity as defined by 10the Illinois Human Rights Act. Any person who is convicted for 11a violation of this Act for a second or subsequent time is 12guilty of a Class 2 felony, unless, as provided under Section 1321-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that person verifies 14under oath that the petition for the name change is due to 15marriage, religious beliefs, status as a victim of trafficking 16or gender-related identity as defined by the Illinois Human 17Rights Act. Any person who is required to register under this 18Article who knowingly or willfully gives material information 19required by this Article that is false is guilty of a Class 3 20felony. Any person convicted of a violation of any provision 21of this Article shall, in addition to any other penalty 22required by law, be required to serve a minimum period of 7 23days confinement in the local county jail. The court shall 24impose a mandatory minimum fine of $500 for failure to comply 25with any provision of this Article. These fines shall be 26deposited in the State Police Operations Assistance Fund   HB2749- 80 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1Offender Registration Fund. Any sex offender, as defined in 2Section 2 of this Act, or sexual predator who violates any 3provision of this Article may be arrested and tried in any 4Illinois county where the sex offender can be located. The 5local police department or sheriff's office is not required to 6determine whether the person is living within its 7jurisdiction. 8    (b) Any person, not covered by privilege under Part 8 of 9Article VIII of the Code of Civil Procedure or the Illinois 10Supreme Court's Rules of Professional Conduct, who has reason 11to believe that a sexual predator is not complying, or has not 12complied, with the requirements of this Article and who, with 13the intent to assist the sexual predator in eluding a law 14enforcement agency that is seeking to find the sexual predator 15to question the sexual predator about, or to arrest the sexual 16predator for, his or her noncompliance with the requirements 17of this Article is guilty of a Class 3 felony if he or she:18        (1) provides false information to the law enforcement 19    agency having jurisdiction about the sexual predator's 20    noncompliance with the requirements of this Article, and, 21    if known, the whereabouts of the sexual predator;22        (2) harbors, or attempts to harbor, or assists another 23    person in harboring or attempting to harbor, the sexual 24    predator; or25        (3) conceals or attempts to conceal, or assists 26    another person in concealing or attempting to conceal, the   HB2749- 81 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    sexual predator.2    (c) Subsection (b) does not apply if the sexual predator 3is incarcerated in or is in the custody of a State correctional 4facility, a private correctional facility, a county or 5municipal jail, a State mental health facility or a State 6treatment and detention facility, or a federal correctional 7facility. 8    (d) Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply if the sex 9offender accurately registered his or her Internet protocol 10address under this Act, and the address subsequently changed 11without his or her knowledge or intent. 12(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (730 ILCS 150/11)14    Sec. 11. Offender Registration Fund. 15    (a) There is created the Offender Registration Fund 16(formerly known as the Sex Offender Registration Fund). Moneys 17in the Fund shall be used to cover costs incurred by the 18criminal justice system to administer this Article and the 19Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Registration Act, 20and for purposes as authorized under this Section. The 21Illinois State Police shall establish and promulgate rules and 22procedures regarding the administration of this Fund. Fifty 23percent of the moneys in the Fund shall be allocated by the 24Department for sheriffs' offices and police departments. The 25remaining moneys in the Fund received under Public Act 101-571   HB2749- 82 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1shall be allocated to the Illinois State Police for education 2and administration of the Act. 3    (b) This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 4remaining balance from the Offender Registration Fund to the 5State Police Operations Assistance Fund as provided under 6subsection (k) of Section 6z-82 of the State Finance Act. This 7Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 9103-616, eff. 7-1-24.) 10    Section 65. The Murderer and Violent Offender Against 11Youth Registration Act is amended by changing Sections 10 and 1260 as follows: 13    (730 ILCS 154/10)14    Sec. 10. Duty to register. 15    (a) A violent offender against youth shall, within the 16time period prescribed in subsections (b) and (c), register in 17person and provide accurate information as required by the 18Illinois State Police. Such information shall include a 19current photograph, current address, current place of 20employment, the employer's telephone number, school attended, 21extensions of the time period for registering as provided in 22this Act and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the 23extension was granted and the date the violent offender 24against youth was notified of the extension. A person who has   HB2749- 83 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for an act which, if 2committed by an adult, would be a violent offense against 3youth shall register as an adult violent offender against 4youth within 10 days after attaining 17 years of age. The 5violent offender against youth shall register: 6        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 7    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 8    period of time of 5 or more days, unless the municipality 9    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 10    register at a fixed location designated by the 11    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 12        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 13    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time 14    of 5 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 15    incorporated, no police chief exists. 16    If the violent offender against youth is employed at or 17attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall 18register: 19        (i) with the chief of police in the municipality in 20    which he or she is employed at or attends an institution of 21    higher education, unless the municipality is the City of 22    Chicago, in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 23    location designated by the Superintendent of the Chicago 24    Police Department; or25        (ii) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 26    is employed or attends an institution of higher education   HB2749- 84 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, no 2    police chief exists. 3    For purposes of this Act, the place of residence or 4temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 5violent offender against youth resides for an aggregate period 6of time of 5 or more days during any calendar year. Any person 7required to register under this Act who lacks a fixed address 8or temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 9jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 5 days 10after ceasing to have a fixed residence.11    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 12in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 13or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 14of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 15The agency of jurisdiction will document each weekly 16registration to include all the locations where the person has 17stayed during the past 7 days. 18    The violent offender against youth shall provide accurate 19information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 20information shall include the current place of employment of 21the violent offender against youth. 22    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 23shall, within 5 days after beginning school or employment in 24this State, register in person and provide accurate 25information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 26information will include current place of employment, school   HB2749- 85 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1attended, and address in state of residence. The out-of-state 2student or out-of-state employee shall register: 3        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 4    which he or she attends school or is employed for a period 5    of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate period of 6    time of more than 30 days during any calendar year, unless 7    the municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he 8    or she shall register at a fixed location designated by 9    the Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 10        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 11    attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 or 12    more days or for an aggregate period of time of more than 13    30 days during any calendar year in an unincorporated area 14    or, if incorporated, no police chief exists.15    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall 16provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 17Police. That information shall include the out-of-state 18student's current place of school attendance or the 19out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 20    (b) Any violent offender against youth regardless of any 21initial, prior, or other registration, shall, within 5 days of 22beginning school, or establishing a residence, place of 23employment, or temporary domicile in any county, register in 24person as set forth in subsection (a) or (a-5). 25    (c) The registration for any person required to register 26under this Act shall be as follows:   HB2749- 86 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 2    subsection (c), any person who has not been notified of 3    his or her responsibility to register shall be notified by 4    a criminal justice entity of his or her responsibility to 5    register. Upon notification the person must then register 6    within 5 days of notification of his or her requirement to 7    register. If notification is not made within the 8    offender's 10 year registration requirement, and the 9    Illinois State Police determines no evidence exists or 10    indicates the offender attempted to avoid registration, 11    the offender will no longer be required to register under 12    this Act. 13        (2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 14    subsection (c), any person convicted on or after the 15    effective date of this Act shall register in person within 16    5 days after the entry of the sentencing order based upon 17    his or her conviction. 18        (3) Any person unable to comply with the registration 19    requirements of this Act because he or she is confined, 20    institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on or after 21    the effective date of this Act shall register in person 22    within 5 days of discharge, parole or release. 23        (4) The person shall provide positive identification 24    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at 25    the registering address. 26        (5) The person shall pay a $20 initial registration   HB2749- 87 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    fee and a $10 annual renewal fee. The fees shall be 2    deposited into the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 3    Offender Registration Fund. The fees shall be used by the 4    registering agency for official purposes. The agency shall 5    establish procedures to document receipt and use of the 6    funds. The law enforcement agency having jurisdiction may 7    waive the registration fee if it determines that the 8    person is indigent and unable to pay the registration fee. 9    (d) Within 5 days after obtaining or changing employment, 10a person required to register under this Section must report, 11in person to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, 12the business name and address where he or she is employed. If 13the person has multiple businesses or work locations, every 14business and work location must be reported to the law 15enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 16(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 17    (730 ILCS 154/60)18    Sec. 60. Penalty. Any person who is required to register 19under this Act who violates any of the provisions of this Act 20and any person who is required to register under this Act who 21seeks to change his or her name under Article XXI of the Code 22of Civil Procedure is guilty of a Class 3 felony unless, as 23provided under Section 21-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, 24that person verifies under oath that the petition for the name 25change is due to marriage, religious beliefs, status as a   HB2749- 88 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1victim of trafficking or gender-related identity as defined by 2the Illinois Human Rights Act. Any person who is convicted for 3a violation of this Act for a second or subsequent time is 4guilty of a Class 2 felony unless, as provided under Section 521-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that person verifies 6under oath that the petition for the name change is due to 7marriage, religious beliefs, status as a victim of trafficking 8or gender-related identity as defined by the Illinois Human 9Rights Act. Any person who is required to register under this 10Act who knowingly or willfully gives material information 11required by this Act that is false is guilty of a Class 3 12felony. Any person convicted of a violation of any provision 13of this Act shall, in addition to any other penalty required by 14law, be required to serve a minimum period of 7 days 15confinement in the local county jail. The court shall impose a 16mandatory minimum fine of $500 for failure to comply with any 17provision of this Act. These fines shall be deposited into the 18State Police Operations Assistance Fund Offender Registration 19Fund. Any violent offender against youth who violates any 20provision of this Act may be arrested and tried in any Illinois 21county where the violent offender against youth can be 22located. The local police department or sheriff's office is 23not required to determine whether the person is living within 24its jurisdiction. 25(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB2749- 89 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    Section 70. The Illinois False Claims Act is amended by 2changing Section 8 as follows: 3    (740 ILCS 175/8)  (from Ch. 127, par. 4108)4    Sec. 8. Funds; Grants. 5    (a) There is hereby created the State Whistleblower Reward 6and Protection Fund to be held outside of the State Treasury 7with the State Treasurer as custodian. All proceeds of an 8action or settlement of a claim brought under this Act shall be 9deposited in the Fund. Any attorneys' fees, expenses, and 10costs paid by or awarded against any defendant pursuant to 11Section 4 of this Act shall not be considered part of the 12proceeds to be deposited in the Fund. 13    (b) For all cases resolved before October 1, 2023, monies 14in the Fund shall be allocated as follows: One-sixth of the 15monies shall be paid to the Attorney General Whistleblower 16Reward and Protection Fund, which is hereby created as a 17special fund in the State Treasury, and one-sixth of the 18monies shall be paid to the State Police Operations Assistance 19Fund State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund, 20which is hereby created as a special fund in the State 21Treasury, for State law enforcement purposes. The remaining 22two-thirds of the monies in the Fund shall be used for payment 23of awards to Qui Tam plaintiffs and as otherwise specified in 24this Act, with any remainder to the General Revenue Fund. The 25Attorney General shall direct the State Treasurer to make   HB2749- 90 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1disbursement of funds.2    (c) For all cases resolved on or after October 1, 2023, 3monies in the Fund shall be allocated as follows: One-third of 4the monies shall be paid to the Attorney General Whistleblower 5Reward and Protection Fund. The remaining two-thirds of the 6monies in the Fund shall be used for payment of awards to Qui 7Tam plaintiffs and as otherwise specified in this Act, with 8any remainder to the General Revenue Fund. The Attorney 9General shall direct the State Treasurer to make disbursement 10of funds. 11    (d) The State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection 12Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance 13from the State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund 14to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund as provided 15under subsection (l) of Section 6z-82 of the State Finance 16Act. 17(Source: P.A. 103-145, eff. 10-1-23.) 18    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 19changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 20that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 21represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 22not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 23made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 24Public Act. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect   HB2749- 91 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1September 1, 2026.  HB2749- 92 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 2605/2605-375was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part4    20 ILCS 2605/2605-5855    20 ILCS 2605/2605-5906    20 ILCS 2605/2605-5957    20 ILCS 2605/2605-6058    30 ILCS 105/5.99from Ch. 127, par. 141.999    30 ILCS 105/5.45610    30 ILCS 105/5.46211    30 ILCS 105/5.53012    30 ILCS 105/5.77113    30 ILCS 105/5.90514    30 ILCS 105/5.92015    30 ILCS 105/5.96316    30 ILCS 105/6z-8217    30 ILCS 105/6z-10618    30 ILCS 105/6z-12719    30 ILCS 105/8.3720    430 ILCS 65/5from Ch. 38, par. 83-521    625 ILCS 5/11-90722    705 ILCS 135/15-7023    720 ILCS 5/29B-2624    720 ILCS 550/8from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 70825    720 ILCS 550/10.2from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 710.2  HB2749- 93 -LRB104 11390 RTM 21478 b1    720 ILCS 570/413from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 14132    720 ILCS 646/953    725 ILCS 175/5from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 16554    725 ILCS 175/5.2from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1655.25    730 ILCS 5/5-9-1.2from Ch. 38, par. 1005-9-1.26    730 ILCS 150/37    730 ILCS 150/10from Ch. 38, par. 2308    730 ILCS 150/119    730 ILCS 154/1010    730 ILCS 154/6011    740 ILCS 175/8from Ch. 127, par. 4108